epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/is.xml
		rut4v
		r4úð
		3rúm
		rúst5
		r1v
		rv3að
		r3ve
		r2vi
		rvi3g
		rv3ing
		rv4un
		r3væ
		r3yr
		1rým
		r1þ
		1rækt
		ræmd5a
		1ræn
		ræt3i
		röf4ug
		rök1r
		röl4
		2sa.
		4sab
		2s3að
		s4aðf
		1sag
		4sagr
		4sagt
		sal5at
		4s3ald
		1sa2m
		sam5b
		4sam1e
		sam3m
		sam1s
		sam5y
		2san
		s4ands
		2s3ar
		s4are
		sarg4
		s4aro
		s4arp
		2s1as
		2sat
		sat4a
		2sau
		s3auk
		4sav
		sá4
		s3áb
		s5áf
		sálar5
		s1ár
		s3ás
		s1b
		s3d4
		1se
		2s1ef
		4seld.
		5semi
		5sens
		2ser
		2ses
		3set
		sex3
		2s1ey
		s4eyð
		1sé
		s5f4
		sfl4
		sfr4
		s1g4
		sgl2
		s1h
		shá4s
		s1i
		s3ið.
		5s4iða
		s4iði
		sif2
		si5fi
		1sig
		sind4ar
		sind4as
		5sinnu
		2s5ins
		s3ir
		s3ist
		s4isv
		si3ta
		sí3br
		1síð
		síðk4
		sígl4
		s3ík
		sí4m
		sínk5a
		s3ír
		s1ís
		s5íu.
		sí3v
		sí4ve
		1sj
		s3jaf
		sjar4
		s4já
		sjó5l
		sjó3m4
		sjó3s
		4sju
		3sjú
		s2k
		2sk.
		4ska.
		4skað
		skaf4a
		4skal
		2skan
		1ska4p
		4skas
		1ská
		1skei
		3skemm
		4sken
		3skey
		s4k2i
		2ski.
		4skið
		sk3inu
		3skip
		2skir
		4skis
		3skír
		5skjá
		4sk4n
		3skoð
		4skon
		4skos
		1s4kot
		1skó
		5skóg
		1skrá
		4skró
		3skrú
		4sks
		sk3uri
		sk3ust
		2skv
		1sky
		3ský
		1skæ
		sla2
		sla3f
		s4lam
		slands5
		3s4lé
		sl2is
		s1lí
		s4líð
		s3lof
		s3lok
		1sló
		slu3s
		1slys
		s3læk
		s1m2
		4sma
		smá1s
		smá5v
		4sme
		s4mek
		s2mi
		1smí
		smj4
		4smö
		s2ne
		3sneið
		5sner
		s3nes
		3sneyd
		sn4ið
		sn2o
		1snú
		4snúm
		s4ný
		snæð5
		1so
		4sod
		3son
		2sor
		s5orði
		1só4
		s4ól
		sól3e
		sól3s
		2sóm
		s5ómag
		4sós
		1sp2
		spít3
		spj4
		4spl
		4spra
		2spró
		s5pund
		sr2an
		s5rau
		s1rá
		s1re
		s1ré
		s1rí
		s5ro
		s5ræ
		s3rö
		s3s4á
		ss3er
		ss5í
		s1s4k4
		ssl2
		ssm4
		ss5or
		s1st
		s4stir
		s1sv
		s2t
		2st.
		s4ta
		2sta.
		4stal
		4stap
		5starfi
		5starfs
		4staæ
		1ste
		3stef
		3stein
		5stekk
		4stet
		1sté
		st4he
		4sti.
		1stig
		st4isl
		3stíg
		2stím
		4stíu
		1stj4
		4stjón
		5stjór
		5stjör
		4stl
		st3le
		1sto
		3stof
		1stó
		4stón
		3stór
		st2r
		str5al
		5stranda
		5strang
		5straum
		5strá.
		1stre
		3strí
		4strú
		s3try
		5strön
		st5t
		2s4tu
		3stund
		1st2ú
		4stv
		3stý
		1stæ
		2stæk
		1s4tö
		3stöð
		4stöl
		5stöng
		s1u
		su3f4
		5sum3a
		s2ung
		s5upp
		s5ura
		sust4i
		sú4
		súln4
		s5ún
		s5úrs
		sút5
		sv4
		4svag
		4sval
		s3vat
		s5veð
		s4vef
		s2vei
		s3veik
		3svein
		5svep
		4svex
		s4viði
		5sviði.
		s4vik
		svik3u
		s5vin
		s1vo
		s2væ
		1svæð
		1sy
		2s3yfi
		3syn
		4s3yr
		3s4ý
		s1þ
		1sæ
		4sæð
		sæf4
		sæ5fa
		3sæj
		3sæl
		4sæs
		1sö
		3sög
		sögu5s
		2s3öld
		3söm
		2s3ör
		t2að
		ta2fr
		1taka
		5takend
		t4al.
		tala4m
		4tam
		ta1ma
		t5amt
		ta4ná
		3tang
		4tar
		t4ar4að
		tar5is5
		tark4
		tarp4
		tar5sá
		taræv4
		t1as
		t4as.
		ta5sl
		tat4
		ta4ví
		t4á4
		5tákn
		4tánd
		t1b
		t1d
		4tegí
		5tegu
		tei4
		tein5g
		t1eis
		1tek
		3tekj
		tekkj5
		t1end
		ten5ó
		4tepl
		t3ett
		2tey
		té4l
		t3f2
		tfirr4
		t1g
		t1h
		th5ers
		t1i
		ti4an
		ti5kis
		tild4
		4tin
		tirk4
		t4iræ
		tist4
		t5ist.
		ti3sta
		tistil4
		t2isv
		1tit
		1tí
		4tí.
		4tía
		3tíð
		tí4l
		3tím
		4tín
		4tít
		tív3
		t4jö
		t1k
		tk4a
		t4k2i
		tlaf4
		t3lag
		t4lag.
		tl2an
		tl5ann
		t1lá
		tl2i
		tlur4
		t1læ
		2t3m4
		tn2s
		tnsk4
		tnskr4
		to4
		1tog
		t3on
		3torg
		5toru
		1tóm
		tóm3a
		tóm5as
		5tónl
		tór1
		tór5au
		tóri3s
		t1ót
		t3p
		tra2b
		5traðari
		tr3alí
		tr2an
		tr3ann
		tr5ar
		3traus
		t4rey
		1tré
		tr4is
		t5risi
		t5ríka
		3trj
		t5róf
		tr3ótt
		tr3ug
		tr3una
		tr5uni
		1t4rú
		1try
		t5ryð
		t3ræn
		3tröð
		4ts
		t1sa
		ts4inn
		t5sí
		tsj4
		t1sk4
		ts1s
		t1st4
		ts4u
		t2sy
		tt3að
		ttak4i
		ttar5f
		tt5á
		tte5rí
		tt5ern
		t4tí
		tt5j
		tt1l
		tt1or
		tt3ræ
		tt3ug
		tt4ugl
		ttv4
		t1tæ
		t1u
		4tu.
		t4uði
		tugl4
		tuk4
		tu3l4ið
		tum2
		tu5min
		t2ung
		3t4ungl
		tup4
		t3ur3e
		tur3k
		t5urs
		t4usa
		t4usu
		tutr4
		túd3
		t3úð
		tú4l
		1tún
		tún4a
		t1úr
		tú3sk
		t1v
		5tveggj
		t5ver
		5týs
		t1þ
		3tæk
		1tök
		1töl
		t5öls
		2u1a
		u3af
		u5au
		2u1á4
		uáætl4
		4u1b4
		4uc
		4ud4
		u1da
		u5dá
		u3de
		u3dó
		u3dr
		2uða
		uð4are
		uð3k4
		2uðl
		uðm4
		2uð4n
		2uðr
		uð5ris
		uð4se
		uð3sv
		uð5sæ
		4uðul
		2u5e
		4ué
		4uf
		uf5á
		ufd4
		u5fit
		u3fj
		u1fr
		u3ful
		u5fú
		2ug
		4ugal
		4ugat
		4uge
		4ugil
		4u1gj
		4ugla
		ug1lj
		4uglu
		ug4n
		4ugó
		u5gran
		4ugre
		4ugrj
		4ugró
		ug3ræ
		ug3ta
		4ugö
		4u1h
		4ui
		u5ið
		4uí4
		2uj
		2uk
		ukak4
		uk4as
		u1ke
		u5kinnin
		ukku3s
		u5kó
		u3kv
		2ul
		3ul.
		4u1lag
		ul3ar
		3ulb
		4ule
		u5lind
		ul4is
		u1lí
		ul3k2
		ul4la
		4ulln
		ullt4
		4u3lo
		u3ló
		ul5sv
		ult4i
		ul3us
		ul5v4
		u3læ
		4u1lö
		3um.
		2uma
		umak4
		u1man
		um4aran
		2umá
		umál4ar
		um4ba
		um5bæ
		um4bö
		2umd
		2ume
		um3ein
		4umi
		umj4
		um4ki
		4uml
		umm4a
		4u5mo
		2umó
		4ump
		2umr
		ums4
		um3sl
		3umst.
		um1t4
		4umu
		um5unn
		4umú
		2umy
		2umý
		2umæ
		2umö
		un3ar1
		unar5a
		un2as
		4unat
		2u1nau
		2uná
		2und
		4une
		4unk
		2unná
		4unns
		2unnu
		unn5ug
		4uno
		4unó
		uns4an
		4unt
		1unu
		4unur
		4unæ
		4unö
		2u3o
		uol4
		4uó
		2up
		upp1
		upp5a
		uppal5
		upp4i
		3ur.
		2ura
		ura4f
		ur5a4m
		ur2an
		ur5anna
		2urá
		urða5rá
		2ure
		u1rek
		ur3ey
		4u1ré
		urf4a
		ur3fl
		urg4e
		ur3gj
		ur5in
		4urit
		4urí
		u3rík
		ur3j4
		urk4a
		ur1m
		ur3ní
		4uro
		4uró
		ur1sk4
		ur3sna
		ur4sta
		ur4svö
		ur5til
		urt4ir
		ur1u
		ur4unn
		4urus
		ur3v4
		ur4vis
		4uryk
		4urý
		2uræ
		4urö
		2usa
		u3sal
		4us4á
		2use
		4usí
		2usj
		4u1sk
		4usl
		2u3s4m
		2usn
		4uso
		4usó
		4usp
		u5starf
		4ustá
		4uste
		2usté
		2usti
		2ustí
		4usto
		4ustó
		4ustr
		3ustu.
		2ustú
		4usty
		4ustý
		4ustæ
		4ustö
		u5sund
		4u3sv
		4usy
		2usý
		2usö
		2ut
		ut3að
		ut2as
		u3te
		u5til
		u3tó
		ut4stó
		ut2ú
		u1tæ
		2u3u
		4u5ú
		4u3v
		2uy
		u3yf
		2u1þ
		4uæ
		2u5ö
		ú1a
		úal4
		ú3arf
		úb3an
		úbli3
		úð3ar
		úð5g
		ú3e
		úf5ar
		úfl2
		úf5li
		úf5ly
		úfs4á
		ú5gala
		úgó3
		ú4gæ
		4ú1i
		úk1l
		úkr1u
		úk4s
		úl5er
		5úl4f
		úlf5al
		úl4í3
		úlíp4
		ú3lo
		4ú2m
		úm4r
		úm4si
		ú4n
		únd4ug
		ún4gö
		úpl5i
		úr5ef
		úrít4
		úr5sl
		úr1t
		úr3un
		úr5v
		ú3ræ
		2ús
		ú4sa
		ús3ei
		ús3í
		ús4sti
		ús4sv
		ús1v
		út3e
		út2he
		úti5f
		út2is
		útj4
		út1l2
		út1r
		4ú1u
		ú1v
		ú4va
		ú5þ
		v2a2
		vaðr5
		va5fo
		va5h
		5vallag
		va4n
		var4ma
		varps3
		var5ú
		var4v
		v3ast
		va4t
		3vax
		veð5l
		ve3fe
		1veg
		v2ei
		3veið
		vein4as
		5veis
		4velg
		2vep
		v4er
		1verð
		ver3gj
		3verk
		ver2s
		vé2
		v5és
		v3ét5
		2v3h
		v2i
		2vi.
		v4ið
		5viðar
		við3l
		vil4i
		vi3lið
		3viln
		vi4lo
		vin3gj
		4vip
		3virk
		visk5un
		3viss
		vis4v
		5vita
		vitk5
		vit2n
		4viv
		4víb
		2víð
		5vík
		3vísi
		vísl3a
		ví1v
		2vn
		vo3k
		vol4
		vork4
		vor4r
		4vr1
		4vs
		2vu
		v1uð
		v1un
		5væg
		wa4
		win4s4
		x5ar
		x2as
		x3e
		x3f
		x5i
		xis4
		xí3
		xík4
		x5íu
		xt5að
		x1u4
		y5ba
		yð2s
		yf5a
		yf1i
		yfj5að
		yft4is
		y1i
		yj3ar
		yj5ó
		yk5e
		yk3i
		yk3su
		yk3u
		yk3v
		ylf5i
		ylgn4
		yll5a
		yl4v
		ym3a
		ymp5í
		y4n
		ynj5ar
		ynj3ó
		yn4k
		yn4t
		yn5u
		yp2us
		yr5e
		yr1i
		yr3il
		yrir3
		yrj3
		yrkv3a
		yr2l
		yr2s
		yr1u
		y2s
		ysj3
		ys2s
		yst3ug
		yt4h
		ytil4
		yt4k
		y3v
		ý5a
		ýaf5
		ý5á
		ýð2s
		ýfl4
		ý3flu
		ýg4r
		ýg4uð
		ý1i
		ýja5f4
		ým4a
		ým4k
		ýpru4
		ýp2s
		ýrf4
		ýri3m
		ýri5p4
		ýr3l
		ý4si
		ýsig4
		ýs4l
		ýs4m
		ý3stá
		ý5u
		ý5ú
		ý3v
		ý5y
		zó4
		þ2a
		þam4
		þarf5a
		þar4m
		4þb
		þ2i
		þist3i
		þjó4
		þol5a
		þor3f4
		þor3g
		þorm4
		þ1ól
		3þór
		þór5i
		þ2r2
		þra4
		þrás4
		þris4
		þríl4
		þrí3t
		þru4
		þum5a
		þumb3
		þur2
		þús3
		þ2v
		þver5sk
		æ1b
		æðn5
		æðnis5
		æð2s
		æð4ug
		4æf
		æf1a
		æ4fi
		æf3ust
		æg5ist
		æ1i
		æj3
		æj4al
		æjark4
		æk1a
		æk1li
		æk3u
		æ2l
		æl3an
		æl3e
		æl3us
		æm3a
		æm4al
		æ4mundu
		ænak4
		æn4k
		ær1a
		ær3e
		ærgöng5
		ærif4
		ær3ist
		æri3sv
		ær3l
		ær4n
		ær2s
		ær5un
		ær1us
		æ5rú
		æs4is
		æt5ise
		ætl5i
		æ5u
		æva5g
		æ5val
		æv3ar
		æv4ara
		æ3ve
		æv3in
		öð2
		öðl3
		öðm5
		öð3un
		öðv5an
		öðv3ar
		ö1fa
		öfl3ó
		öfn5
		öfr3u
		öf3u
		ö4g
		ög3gj
		öggv3
		ög1re
		ög2us
		ök5e
		ök5rá
		ök3st
		ök3ul
		ökv3a
		ö4l
		öl1f4
		ölk2
		ölu5mi
		öl5un
		öl2v
		ölv5an
		öm4b
		öm3u
		önd4l
		öng5sv
		öng4us
		öng4v
		öngv3a
		önk3
		önn4l
		ön3ug
		ön5un
		ör1e
		ör4ge
		ör4lan
		örm5un
		ör3ó
		ör3ug
		ör1un
		ör3und
		örus4
		ör2v
		4örva
		örv5al
		örv5an
		örv5ar
		örv4i
		ör1y
		ör5æ
		ö4s
		ösk3ul
		ös3u
		öt4s
		ö3tug
		öt2v
		ötv3a
		ö5u
		þ6ó
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
